Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.090

Injunction.

The director or any aggrieved producer, accredited association, or handler may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation made pursuant to this chapter in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

[ 1989 c 355 s 10.]